Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. Public Building and School Sites; Public Utility Plants and
Facilities

§§ 1-26-101 through 1-26-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to eminent domain, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

.

Editor's notes. —

This article derived from Laws 1882, ch. 13, § 10, Laws 1890, ch. 64, § 1, Laws 1901, ch. 70, § 1, and Laws 1933, ch. 78, §§ 1 through 7.